hr-HR: Vrsta punila za vazu: Akrilni dragulji; Perle; Konfeti; Kristali; Ukrasne školjke; Suho lišće; Umjetno voće; Umjetne latice; Perje; Pjenaste kuglice; Staklene pikule; Šljokice; Mahovina; Kamenčići; Češeri; Kuglice od ratana; Pijesak; Slama/sijeno; Drveni štapovi; Ostalo
el: Τύπος γεμίσματος βάζου: Ακρυλικό Gem; Χάντρες; Κομφετί; Κρύσταλλοι; Διακοσμητικά κοχύλια; Αποξηραμένα φύλλα; Ψεύτικα φρούτα; Ψεύτικα πέταλα; Φτερά; Μπάλες αφρού; Γυαλί Marble; Γκλίτερ; Βρύο; Βότσαλα/Πέτρες; Κουκουνάρια; Μπάλες από μπαμπού; Άμμος; Άχυρο/Σάχος; Ξύλινα μπαστούνια; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta polnila za vazo: Akrilni Gem; Biseri; Konfeti; Kristali; Dekorativne školjke; Posušeni listi; Umetno sadje; Umetni cvetni listi; Perje; Penaste kroglice; Stekleni Marble; Bleščice; Mah; Kamenčki/kamni; Borovi storži; Ratan kroglice; Pesek; Slama/seno; Lesene palice; Druga
es: Tipo de relleno para jarrón: Gemacrílica; Cuentas y abalorios; Confeti; Cristales; Conchas decorativas; Hojas secas; Fruta falsa; Pétalos falsos; Plumas; Pelotas de espuma; Canicas; Purpurina; Musgo; Guijarros/Piedras; Piñas; Bolas de ratán; Arena; Paja/heno; Palitos de madera; Otros
zh-TW: 花瓶填充物類型: 壓克力寶石; 珠子; 彩色紙屑; 水晶; 裝飾貝殼; 乾燥葉; 人造水果; 人造花瓣; 羽毛; 泡沫球; 玻璃彈珠; 亮粉; 苔蘚; 鵝卵石/石頭; 松果; 藤球; 沙子; 稻草/乾草; 樹枝; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de enchimento para vasos: Pedras acrílicas; Contas; Confetti; Cristais; Conchas decorativas; Folhas secas; Frutas falsas; Pétalas artificiais; Penas; Bolas de espuma; Berlindes de vidro; Purpurinas; Musgo; Pedras/Seixos; Pinhas; Bolas de rattan; Areia; Palha/Feno; Varetas de madeira; Outro
sv: Typ av vasfyllare: Akrylstenar; Kulor; Konfetti; Kristaller; Dekorativa snäckor; Torkade blad; Konstfrukt; Konstblad; Fjädrar; Skumbollar; glaskulor; Glitter; Mossa; Småsten / stenar; Tallkottar; Rottingbollar; Sand; Halm / hö; Träpinnar; Annat
th: ประเภทของวัสดุสำหรับตกแต่งแจกัน: คริสตัลอะคริลิกตกแต่ง; ลูกปัด; เศษกระดาษสีที่ใช้โปรยในงานรื่นเริง; คริสตัล; เปลือกหอยประดับ; ใบไม้แห้ง; ผลไม้ปลอมตกแต่ง; กลีบดอกไม้ปลอมตกแต่ง; ขนนก; ลูกบอลโฟม; ลูกแก้วตกแต่ง; กลิตเตอร์; มอส; ก้อนกรวด/หิน; ลูกสนแห้ง; ลูกบอลหวาย; ทราย; ฟาง/หญ้าแห้ง; แท่งไม้; อื่นๆ
hu: Vázatöltő típusa: Akril drágakövek; Gyöngyök; Konfetti; Kristályok; Díszkagylók; Szárított levelek; Műgyümölcs; Műszirmok; Toll; Habgolyók; Üveggolyók; Csillám; Moha; Kavicsok/kövek; Fenyőtobozok; Rattangolyók; Homok; Szalma/széna; Fapálcák; Egyéb
fr: Type de matériau de remplissage pour vase: Gemmes acryliques; Perles; Confettis; Cristaux; Coquillages décoratifs; Feuilles séchées; Faux fruits; Faux pétales; Plumes; Boules de mousse; Billes de verre; Paillettes; Mousse; Cailloux/Pierres; Pommes de pin; Boules en rotin; Sable; Paille/Foin; Bâtonnets de bois; Autre
ko: 화병 충전재 유형: 아크릴 보석 ; 비즈; 색종이 조각; 수정; 장식용 조개껍데기; 말린 잎; 인조 과일; 인조 꽃잎; 깃털; 폼 볼; 유리 구슬; 반짝이; 이끼; 조약돌/자갈; 솔방울; 라탄 볼; 모래; 짚/건초; 우드 스틱; 기타
cs: Typ dekoračního materiálu do vázy: Akrylové korálky; Kuličky/korálky; Konfety; Krystaly; Dekorativní mušle; Sušené listy; Umělé ovoce; Umělé okvětní lístky; Peří; Pěnové kuličky; Skleněné kuličky; Třpytky; Mech; Oblázky/kamínky; Šišky; Ratanové koule; Písek; Sláma/Seno; Dřevěné tyčinky; Jiné
ru: Тип наполнителя для вазы: Акриловые камни; Бусины; Конфетти; Кристаллы; Декоративные ракушки; Сухие листья; Искусственные фрукты; Искусственные лепестки; Перья; Поролоновые шарики; Стеклянные шарики; Блестки; Мох; Галька/камни; Сосновые шишки; Ротанговые шарики; Песок; Солома/сено; Деревянные палочки; Другое
nb: Vasefylltype: Akrylperler; Perler; Konfetti; Krystaller; Dekorative skjell; Tørkede blader; Falsk frukt; Falske kronblader; Fjær; Skumballer; Marble; Glitter; Mose; Steiner/småstein; Furukongler; Rottingballer; Sand; Halm/høy; Trepinner; Annet
ja: 花瓶フィラーのタイプ: アクリルジェム; ビーズ; 紙吹雪; クリスタル; 装飾用の貝殻; 乾燥した葉; 人工フルーツ; 人工花びら; フェザー; フォームボール; ガラス玉; グリッター; 苔; 小石/石; 松ぼっくり; ラタンボール; 砂; わら/干し草; 木の棒; その他
de: Vasenfüller: Acrylsteine; Perlen; Konfetti; Kristalle; Dekorative Muscheln; Getrocknete Blätter; Kunstfrüchte; Künstliche Blütenblätter; Federn; Schaumstoffbälle; Glasmurmeln; Glitzer; Moos; Kieselsteine/Steine; Tannenzapfen; Rattankugeln; Sand; Stroh/Heu; Holzstäbe; Sonstiges
da: Vasefyld: Akryliske korn; Perler; Konfetti; Krystaller; Dekorative skaller; Tørrede blade; Falsk frugt; Falske kronblade; Fjer; Skumbolde; Glaskugler; Glitter; Mos; Småsten/sten; Kogler; Rattanbolde; Sand; Halm/hø; Træpinde; Andet
fi: Maljakon täyteaineen tyyppi: Akryylijalokivet; Koruhelmet; Konfetti; Kristallit; Koristeelliset kuoret; Kuivatut lehdet; Keinohedelmä; Keinoterälehdet; Höyhenet; Vaahtopallot; Lasihelmet; Kimalle; Sammal; Kivet/pikkukivet; Männynkävyt; Rottinkipallot; Hiekka; Olki/heinä; Puukepit; Muu
vi: Loại vòi rót bình hoa: Đá quý acrylic; Hạt tròn; Hoa giấy; Pha lê; Vỏ sò trang trí; Lá khô; Trái cây giả; Cánh hoa giả; Lông vũ; Bóng xốp; Bi thủy tinh; Óng ánh; Rêu; Sỏi/Đá; Quả thông; Bóng mây; Cát; Rơm/Cỏ khô; Que gỗ; Khác
lt-LT: Vazos užpildo tipas: Akriliniai brangakmeniai; Karoliukai; Konfeti; Kristalai; Dekoratyvinės kriauklės; Džiovinti lapai; Dirbtiniai vaisiai; Dirbtiniai žiedlapiai; Plunksnos; Putplasčio kamuoliukai; Stikliniai rutuliukai; Blizgus; Samanos; Akmenukai; Pušies kankorėžiai; Rotango kamuoliukai; Smėlis; Šiaudai / Šienas; Medinės lazdelės; Kita
bg-BG: Тип пълнеж за ваза: Акрилен кристал; Малки топчета; Конфети; Кристали; Декоративни черупки; Сушени листа; Изкуствени плодове; Изкуствени листенца; Пера; Топки от пяна; Стъклени топчета; Блясък; Мъх; Малки камъчета/камъни; Шишарки; Ратанови топки; Пясък; Слама/сено; Дървени пръчки; Друго
zh-CN: 花瓶填充料的类型: 亚克力宝石; 串珠; 五彩纸屑; 水晶; 装饰贝壳; 干叶; 仿真水果; 仿真花瓣; 羽毛; 泡沫球; 玻璃弹珠; 闪粉; 苔藓; 鹅卵石/石头; 松果; 藤球; 沙子; 稻草/干草; 木枝; 其他
pl: Typ wypełniacza wazonu: Kamyki akrylowe; Koraliki; Konfetti; Kryształki; Muszle dekoracyjne; Suszone liście; Sztuczne owoce; Sztuczne płatki; Piórka; Kulki piankowe; Szklane kulki; Brokat; Mech; Kamienie / otoczaki; Szyszki; Kulki rattanowe; Piasek; Słoma/Siano; Patyki drewniane; Inne
sk-SK: Typ výplne do vázy: Akrylové kamienky; Korálky; Konfety; Kryštály; Dekoratívne mušle; Sušené listy; Umelé ovocie; Umelé okvetné lístky; Perie; Penové guľôčky; Sklenené guľôčky; Trblietky; Mach; Kamienky/Kamene; Šišky; Ratanové gule; Piesok; Slama/Seno; Drevené palice; Iné
it: Tipo di riempitivo per vasi: Gem acrilici; Perline; Coriandoli; Cristalli; Conchiglie decorative; Foglie secche; Frutta finta; Petali finti; Piume; Palline di schiuma; Vetro Marble; Glitter; Muschio; Ciottoli/Pietre; Pigne; palline di rattan; Sabbia; Paglia/Fieno; Bastoncini di legno; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de umplutură pentru vază: Pietre acrilice; Bile; Confetti; Cristale; Scoici decorative; Frunze uscate; Fructe artificiale; Petale artificiale; Pene; Bile din spumă; Bile din sticlă; Sclipici; Mușchi; Pietriș/pietre; Conuri de pin; Bile de ratan; Nisip; Paie/fân; Bețe de lemn; Altele
en: Vase filler type: Acrylic gems; Beads; Confetti; Crystals; Decorative shells; Dried leaves; Faux fruit; Faux petals; Feathers; Foam balls; Glass marbles; Glitter; Moss; Pebbles/Stones; Pinecones; Rattan balls; Sand; Straw/Hay; Wood sticks; Other
tr: Vazo dolgu malzemesi türü: Akrilik taşlar; Boncuk; Konfeti; Kristal; Dekoratif deniz kabukları; Kurutulmuş yapraklar; Yapay meyve; Yapay çiçek yaprakları; Tüy; Köpük toplar; Cam bilyeler; Sim; Yosun; Çakıl Taşları/Taşlar; Çam kozalakları; Rattan topları; Kum; Saman/Odun; Ahşap çubuklar; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de enchimento do vaso: Gemas acrílicas; Contas; Confetes; Cristais; Conchas decorativas; Folhas secas; Frutas artificiais; Pétalas artificiais; Penas; Bolas de espuma; Bolinhas de vidro; Brilho; Musgo; Pedras/Seixos; Pinhas; Bolas de rattan; Areia; Palha/Feno; Varetas de madeira; Outro
nl: Vulmateriaal vaas: Acrylstenen; Kralen; Confetti; Kristallen; Decoratieve schelpen; Gedroogde bladeren; Kunstfruit; Kunstbloemblaadjes; Veren; Schuimballen; Glazen knikkers; Glitter; Mos; Kiezelstenen; Dennenappels; Rotan ballen; Zand; Stro/hooi; Houten stokken; Overig